Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-142.05
Replica vehicle; application for certificate of title; procedure.

The owner of a kit vehicle may apply for a certificate of title by presenting a manufacturer's statement of origin for the kit, a notarized bill of sale for all major component parts not in the kit, a statement that an inspection has been conducted on the vehicle, and a vehicle identification number as described in section 60-148. The certificate of title shall indicate the year the vehicle resembles, the make the vehicle resembles, and the model the vehicle resembles and shall be branded as replica.

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 10;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 21.